Nebraska statutes.
Reissue Revised Statutes of Nebraska44-4318
Funds or reserve; disclosure; discovery.

Information regarding that portion of the funds or liability reserve of a risk management pool established for the purpose of satisfying a specific claim or cause of action shall be exempt from disclosure under sections 84-712 to 84-712.09. Notwithstanding any other provision of law to the contrary, a party to a claim or action against a public agency or any risk management pool shall not be entitled to discover that portion of the funds or liability reserve established by the pool for purposes of satisfying the claim or cause of action, except that such information shall be discoverable in any supplemental or ancillary proceeding to enforce a judgment against a public agency or risk management pool.

Laws 1987, LB 398, § 18.